tools/nvda/louis/tables/hyph_da_DK.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 1
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
.a2b5s2
.a1b2
.ad2r2
.a1d
.a8d3s
.a2e
.a3g4r2
.agte2r1
.a2gt
.ag1te
.2a2k2j
.a2l2am
.a1la
.a2l5d4
.a2m3p
.2am
.a4n5d4
.a2ner
.a1ne
.ari7s4
.2a5ri
.a3ro
.a4sku
.a2s
.a3sk
.a4s1p2l2
.a3s2p4
.a3s2t
.a4s3t3h4
.a5stu
.a3to
.a1t
.1b4
.ba4sto
.3ba
.ba2s
.ba3st
.be2nen
.7b4e
.be1ne
.be3ro
.bre8d5s
.3br4
.b1re
.bre1d
.c4h6
.1c2
.1d6
.de2ri
.3de
.d2er
.der1i.
.der1i1b2
.de1r3u
.d2i3o
.3di
.3d2æ2k3
.e2a
.e5di
.e1d
.2e2e
.e2f3l2
.e1f
.e4fu
.e4g1n4
.e1g
.2e2i
.ek5st
.e4k1s
.ek6s1te
.el5ve
.e2l2v
.e3n2e
.en4sto
.e6n2s
.en3st
.e2n1ø
.e3r4a
.e3r2i
.e4s3c4h4
.e2s
.e3s2c2
.e3s2k
.e3s2t
.e5st3h4
.e3tu
.e2tå
.e2u
.e1w2
.1f4
.g4
.g2e2e
.3ge
.gel2
.ge4s2n4
.ge2s
.gu5s
.1gu
.1h6
.he8d7s3
.3he1d6
.he2r1i
.hi2n
.i3a
.i3d2
.i3k3l
.in2da
.i4n1d
.in4dr2
.in8d5s2
.i5sa
.i1s
.i6s1ag
.i2sk
.i4s1ke
.is2o
.i4st
.i5sta
.i6ster
.i5ste
.i1t4
.i3t2h4
.i1ø
.j2
.k4
.ka3lu
.ket3
.l2
.la6ven
.la5ve
.la1v
.la2vi
.le2t3
.1le
.li5g2e
.1li
.2lo1p2h4
.lø2n3
.1l6ø
.m4
.m2e4d3r2
.1me
.me1d
.m2e2e
.2m1f1
.mi1e
.1mi
.m2i4s
.mis1k
.n2
.na2s2
.1na
.4n3d
.n2e4dr2
.1ne
.ne1d
.n2e2g3r2
.ne1g
.ne3r2u
.ne2t1op
.n2e1to
.n2e2t2r2
.o2b3
.oli3g
.o1l2i
.o2m3
.o6m5s4
.o4n2d2
.2o2pa
.o2p2h4
.op5ra
.op3r2
.o4p7s
.o1r2a
.or2d3ret
.o2r1d
.ord2r2
.ord1re
.o3ro
.4o2r3t4
.o7s2t
.o1s
.o3ve4
.o1v
.ove2r1
.p6
.2p1s2
.r6
.ra2b3l2
.ra1b2
.2ra2f3
.ri1e.
.ri4s1a
.ri1s
.ri4s2p4
.run4dr2
.ru4n1d
.ru4sta
.ru1s
.ru3st
.1s6
.se3ra
.5se
.si1et
.3si
.5sie
.sk4
.s1o3p4
.3st4
.s8to3ge
.8s7tog
.t4
.tan8d3s
.t2a4n1d
.te3e6n.
.t2e1e
.te2en
.ti3e
.t2i2l1
.ti5st
.ti1s
.to3me
.to3ro
.4t2s2
.u1b4
.u4da
.u2d
.u4d1i
.u8d5s4
.u3fo2
.u2f
.un3d2r2
.u4n1d
.u2rel
.u1re
.u3r2i
.u3r1o1v
.u1ro
.u1rå
.u3s2
.u2s4v2
.u3t1v
.u1t
.1v2
.ve2l3
.3ve
.vi2nel
.vi1ne
.w2
.2x4
.xe3
.y2e
.2y5s4
.yt3
.2y3v
.æ3d3r2
.æ1d
.æ1r1a
.ære4s
.æ1re
.æ3r2i
.æ1r2ø
.å1la
.å2rø
2aa
aa7b4e2
aa1b2
aa1d2
a1a2f
aa1l2u
aa4n2d
abe4s2
a1b2
a7b4e
2abe1v
ab3len
abl2
ab1le
ab6sk
a2b1s1
a2c3l
a1c2
a3cy3
acyk4
ad2a
a1d
a2d3a2gt
a5de
ade2l3s
1a2d1g2
ad2i4o
a3di
2a2d1l
adli4ne.
ad1li
adli1ne
1a2d5m
2a3d2o
adra4s
adr2
a3dra
a2dr2e.
ad1re
ad3rer
a5d4ri
ad1ro
ad3s2m
a8d2s
ad6so
ad2s1p4
ad5sø
2a2d1w
a2d1øl
a3d2ø2l.
a1e
a2e1c2
a2ek
aen2
a2e3no
ae3r2o1
a2e2s
ae3s2t
a2f
2a3fa
a4f1an
3a2f1d
1af3fa
a2f1f
1a2f5g2
1a2f1h4
2a3f2i
af3j
1af3l2
2a3fo
afo3re
1a3f2r2
a4f3re
a4f3ru
1a2f3s2
2af6s3s2
2af6t.
a2f1t
3afta
af2tek
1aft2r2
af4t7s2
af3tvi
af2t1v
3a2f1v
2a2g.
2a1ga
a2g1a3k
agar1
a3ga5s
2a2g1d
ag2e3na
a3ge
age2ra
ag6er
a4g1e1ta
ag1i1d
a1gi
ag1l2a4
ag1lo
2a1go
ag1om
ag1o1v
a2g3r2
2agra2m1m2
a3g4ra
agr2am
ag1ri
ag4ro
a3g4ru
2a2g2s1
ag4sky
ag7st2e3e
ag4st
ag5s2te
ag5s2t2r2
ag4sy
ag3s2å
2ag6t.
a2gt
ag1t2a
1ag1ti
ag2to
ag2t2r2
agt3s5f
ag4t2s
agts1k2r4
agt3sk
a2g3u2d
a1gu
a2gy
ag1ør
a1gø
a2h4
a3ha
a3he
a3hi
a3ho
ah5ra
a2hr
ah5v2
a3hy
aig4
a1ii3
a3i4k.
ai2k5r4
ai3li
a2il
a1in
ai2nek
ai1ne
a1i1v
a1ja
a2j1ar
a1ji
a1jo
aj4s3k
a2j1s
aj4so
a1j2u
a1ka
1aka1d
2a3ke
ake2t
ak2hi
a2k1h4
2a3ki
2a1k2j
2a4k5k4
3ak1ko
2a2k2l
ak3la
a3k4le2s
a2k3le
a3k1li
ak3læ
2a2k1m
2a1ko
a2k1o2f
a1k2r4
a3k4ra
a2k3ren
ak1re
a2k3rø
1ak3s2l2
a4k1s
ak2t1an
a2k1t
ak2t1ek
a1ku
a3k4v
a1kø
ak1ån
a1la
al1a1b4
al2a5g2e
al3a1me
al2am
a2l1a2r1t
ala5sk
ala2s
2ala1t
1al3b4u
a2l1b2
al4d3r2
a2l2d
al3dur
al2ek
a1le
ale5s2p4
ale2s
al1eur
al2gl
a2l1g
al2g3r2
a2l1i4n1d
a1li
alin2g2s3
al2i2ng
ali4sta
ali1s
ali3st
al4k3s
a2l1k
all2e2t2r2
al1l
al3le
all2y3
a1lo
a2lop
al1o6p.
a2l1o1v
al4sin
a2l1s
al3si
al2sk2il
alsk2i
al4sl2
al3s1n4
al2so
al5sta
al3st
al6stø
al4t7s2
a2l1t
a1lu
a2l1u2d
al1un
a2l1ur
alu1s2
al4v2a
a2l2v
4a1l2y
2a1læ
al1år
2am
4a6m.
3amag
a1ma
a3mak
a3ma3ra
am2b3l2
a2m1b2
am1e4d7d2
a1me
ame1d
ame6n6s
ame3ra
ame1u
am3hu2
a2m1h4
a2mom
a1mo
am1o2r1d
3a3m2o1s
am1o3ve
amo1v4
am2pha
a2m1p
amp2h4
am2p2l2
am4s2æ
a6m1s
3am2t5m
a2m1t4
a4m1æ
a3m2ø
a1n2a
a3n1a2f
a2n3ak
a2n3a2l1f
ana2ta
a3na1t
an5ce
a2n1c2
4an8d.
a4n1d
and2ag
an3dr2
and2re
an5d1ry
and4s1k2r4
an8d2s
and3sk
1ane2r3k2
a1ne
ane2tri
an2e1t2r2
an1eur
2an2g.
a2ng
an2g1ag
an1ga
an2gar
2an7ge
1an1g2r2
ang5st2j
an2g2s1
ang4st
ang7s3to
2an1gu
a3ni3a
a1ni
ani4a2s
ani1e2l1s
a3nie
ani4t7s1
ani1t
2a2n3j
an3k1n2
a2n1k
an2k3r4
an8ku
an2k2v
1a2n3l
2a1no
an2ol
a2n1o2r1d
a2n1o1ri
an1o3s2t
ano1s
an6sek
a6n2s
an5se
1an5s2ig
an3si
an3s2k
1an3s2v2
1an3s2æ
ant5sk
a2n1t
an4t2s
an2t3un
an2tø
a3nu
1a2n7v
anv2a4
2an1z
a1o
ao6s
a3pe
a1pha
ap2h4
a1pi
ap1j
ap3la
ap2l2
a1p2o
1ap1pa
a2p5p4
a1p2r2
ap4sti
a2p1s
ap3st
a3py
a2q2
a3qu4
2a4r.
a3ra
a2r2ar
ara4st
ara2s
1a4r3b2
2a2r1d
ar4dek
ar3de
a3re
1are1a
ar2em
2arer2
a5re2s
a4r3g2
2a5ri
ari2e
1arki1t
a2r1k
ar2k2l
2a2r1l
2ar1mø
a4r1m
2a2r1n
arn4st
ar6n2s
a1ro
a2rop
aro2q2
ar2p2h4
a2r1p
ar2p3l2
ar2s3c2
a2r1s
ar2s1k2r4
ar2s3l2
ar2sor
ar2s2v2
ar4s1ø
ar3te
a2r1t
ar3t3hu
ar2t2h4
a1ru
2a1ry
a1ræ
a1rø
a1rå
a2s
a5s2a
as3ag
a7s1ak
as3al
a5s2c2
a5s2e
ase3ri2
a2s2h4
a3she
a4sh5v2
asi6s3e
a3si
asi1s
a3sk
a4sk2j
as1k2r4
a2s2k5ur
a4s2k2v
a4s3l2
a5so
a3s2p4
as4pe
a5spe2r1s
as3per
as3p1le
as1p2l2
as3p2r2
a2s2t2a2s
a3st
a7s2t2e
a8s1t2e1o
aster2å
a4stø
as1tør
a5s2u
as3v2
a4s1ø
a1t
a2t1a1v
a2t1ej
ate2r1æ
a2t4hu5
at2h4
1atla
a2t5l
2at1li
a2t5o1i
at2om
at2o2ma
at3ra
at2r2
a2tra1d
a3t4r2e.
at1re
a3t4ri
atr2o1s3
at1ru
a2t3rø
at3s1a
a4t2s
at6s2am
at3s1h4
at3s1o
at6ste
at3st
a2t1u2d
a2tæ
at5æn
a3tø
2au
4au1c2
a2u8d.
au2d
a2u3d1r2
au3e2
au2g1l
au2g7s1
aug6s2t
3auk
aum4
a1u4n1d
aun5st
a2u6n4s
au3r2e
au3ro
au3s2c2
au1s
ave3da
a1v
a3ve
ave1d
av1e4d7d2
a7ve4n1d
1avi1s
av2l4s
a2v1l
a2v1o1v
av4sk
a4v2s
avs1k2r4
av4s1l2
av4s1o
av4s5ø
a2vu
2a3vy
avæ2r4s
a3væ
a1w
a2wr
ay1o
a1æ1
á2
à1
ä2c2
ä1g
ä1l
äm1me3
ä2m1m2
än1ni5
ä2n1n2
ä2s1l2
ä1s
â1
1b2
4b.
3ba
ba2g1i
b2a2go
b2a2g5s4
ba3ro
ba5s4a
ba2s
ba3s2h4
ba2t3r2
ba1t
2b7b2
2b1c2
2b3d
7b4e
be3a
be4a1t
be5ate
be3d1ro
b2e2dr2
be1d
be3d2å
b2e2e
be3gl
be1g
be2lå
be3n1ak
b2e2na
be3na2s
be3na1v
ben1e4n1d
be1ne
be6n2s2
be2nø
be3ren
be1re
be3r1op3l2
be1ro
be2r1op
be3r1o1v
be2s2
be5sta
be3st
be3te4
be3ti
b2e1t4r2
be3t2v
2b3f
2b3g
2b3h4
3bi
bi8d5s2
bi1d
bi1e6n2s
bi1er
bi5ka
bil4sa
b2il
bi2l1s
bi2lu
b2i1o
bi3o.
bi1s2
bi3s1h4
b1je2
2b3k2
bl2
ble2s2
b1le
b4le2t1t
bl4ou6
b1lo1v6
blu2e
bl2y3
2b3m
2b7n
7b4o
1b2o2b3
bo2ga
bo2gi
bo2g2r2
bo2g5s1
bog6sk
bo2i
b2o2l4d
bo2l1s2
bol3sp4
bo1p4
bo2r1ak
bo1ra
bor4den
bo2r1d
bor3de
bo1r2e
bo1r2u
bo1rå
bo4s3p4
bo1s
bo5s2t
2b3p
3br4
bral3
bra2ng5
b2r1f1
b4ro
bro1p4
2b1s1
b3s2a
b4s1a2f
b4s3a1t
bs3c2
b5s2e
bs3ej
b2s5f
b3s2i
b3s2ke
bs3ko
bs3li
b2sl2
b3sor
b4st2
b6sta2s
b5s2t2r2
b6stu
b3s2u
b6s3u2d
bs3v2
b4sø
2b3t
b7te
3b4u
bu8d4s
bu2d
bud5sk
bu2g3s1
bu2s
bu4s2k2l
bu4so
bu4st
bu5sta
bu5sto
bus1t2r2
bu2t3r2
bu1t
bü1
2b3v
2b3w
3by
by2e.
by1e
by3sp4
b2y1s
by1t2r2
bz1
3b4æ
bæ1h5
b2æk1
bø2r1n4
bå8d3s
bå1d
1c2
2c.
ca2b5s1
ca1b2
ca2e3
can5di
ca4n1d
candi4a
ca2p3
ca4s5pe
ca2s
ca3s2p4
ca3s2t
2c3b2
2c3c2
cce8s3
2c3d
ce3d
c2e3na
4ce1ne
2c3e2ng
c2e3no
cen4si
ce6n2s
3ce2n1t
ce2ra2s
ce1ra
ce3r2i
ce2r2s1
cer4t2h4
ce2r1t
cer2to
ce1rå
ce5sa
ce2s
1c2e4s2c2
ce4so
ce3s6v2
3cet
2c3f
2c3g
c4h4
4c6h.
3ch2au
2ch5b2
2c2h5d2
ch2e3e
5che1f
2c2h5f
2ch5g
2c2h5h4
2c2h5k
4c2hl
4c2h6m
4c2hn
2c2h5p
c2h6r
2c2h1s
2c2ht
4c3hæ
ci2d3r2
ci1d
ci1en
1c2i1e2n2c2
ci2en6t.
ci1e2n1t
3ci2f
ci4n5d2
ci2ni
3c2ir
ci3sk
ci1s
c3j
2ck3
c4k1n2
c4ko
c4k5s4
c3ku
c4kup
c1k5v
2c2l.
1c2la1c2
c4la1v
2c3m
2c3n
co3d
co1l2o
3con
co6n4s2
co1p3r2
co1r2e
co3ri
co1ru
3co1s
5cou
cou7s2
3co1v
2c3p
2c1s
c3sl2
2c3t
3cu
cu2a
cu5st
cu1s
3cy1
c1y2a
cy3r
cæ5
cæ1s2
1d
8d.
3da.
2d1a1d
5d2a2d1l
3d2a3d2o
4d1a2f
5d2a3f2i
5d2a3fo
da2g1i
dag4s3t
d2a2g2s1
2d1a2gt
3d4a2h4
2d1a2ir
2da1la
2d3a2l2d
5dal1l
d1a2l1t
4d1a4n1d
da3ni4a
da1ni
4d1a2n3l
2d1an3s2v2
da6n2s
d1anta
da2n1t
dan4t2s2
d1ar
d2a3ra
2d1a4r3b2
dar8d3s4
1d2a2r1d
2d1are1a
da3re
2d3a2r1t
d1a5s2e
da2s
da3s2h4
da4s5p4
data3
da1t
da2te.
da2tek
da4t3s4
3day
2d3b2
d7bl2
dbu8d6s
d3b4u
1dbu2d
2d1c2
4d7d2
ddag8
dde2la
d3de
3de
7de.
de3ar
de1a
1de3d4
dedel4
de3de
d2e3e
4d1e2f1f
de1f
6d1e2f1t
de3gl
de1g
de1i1s
d2ei
5d2e2j.
dej3s1k
d2e2j1s
de3k1n2
de1k4r4
4d1ek3si
de4k1s
4d1ek2sp4
de2lak
de1la
4d1elem
de1le
del2s2c2
de2l1s
del2sk
dels1k2r4
del4s3l2
del2s3m
del2s3v2
de3lu
de2lå
4d1e2m1b2
demi1e
de3m2i
4d1e2m1n
5de6n.
de3n1ar
d2e2na
4denden
3den3d2e
1de4n1d
4d1en6d1t
5de1ne
6d3ene4r1g
4de2ng
d1en7ge
de2n1i.
de1ni
5de6n2s
den4so
den4sti
den3st
den6s1u
d2en6t.
de2n1t
den2tek
dent2e
d1entu
de2nø2s
de1nø
d2er
de2r1ak
de1ra
4d3erh1v2
de2r1h4
d2e7ri1e
de1ri
de3ri1s
de2r1t2
der3t1v
d2e3s1h4
de2s
de3s2k
de4s3n4
de4sor
de3so
des4pe
de3s2p4
de3s2t
de4s3t2ag
de8s2u
de4s3væ
de3s4v2
de4s1å
de2t2h4
det3he
de1u1s
2d1f
d5fa
2d1g2
d3ge2
dget3
2d1h4
3d2hi
d3h2il
d3hu2
dhu6s
3di
di3a.
di1a
di2a1b2
4di3de
1di1d
4d1idé
di4dri
didr2
4d1i3dy
4d1ie1d
di1en
5dig
dig1l
di2g2r2
di3gru
di2g3s1
5dik
4d1i4n1d
d2i1ni
d1in5se
di6n2s
4d1in3s2p4
d1i2n1t
d2i2o
di3o1t
4d3i2r1l
d2ir
di3s1h4
di1s
di4sha
di3s2k2r4
di4s3k3v
di4s3p4
di4s2æ
di1ø
2d1j
3d2jel
d1je
6d5k2
2d1l
dle6m4s
d1le
d3l2er
3d2l2e1to
dli4n1i
d1li
d5lo
d1lo1v4
d7lu
2d5m
d7ma
d3me
d3mu
2d5n2
d7ni
d3no
d3nu
do2b3
2d1o2f
2dog
3d2o1ga
3d2o3ge
3d2o6m.
2d1o2m1r
do6m4s
dom2s1k
dom3s1p4
doms1tæ
d2om3st
do1ni2
2d1onke
do2n1k
2d1op
3d2o1po
do1r2a
4d1o2r1d
do1r2e
do3r2i
2d1o4r1m
do3ro
do1rå
dou3
2do1v
do3v2e
2d5p4
dpen3s3l2
d1pe
d3pe6n2s
2d1q2
dr2
3dra
5dr2a.
5dra1b2
4d1rak
4d1ran
4d1rap
4d1ra3s4p4
dra2s
d2re1a
d1re
d3re8d.
1dre1d
d3reda
4d3re1g
5d4r2e1g4r2
d4re3gu
4drej
5d2re1p
d2rer
dre4ru
d2re2s
4d3re5se
4d3re1ti
4d3re2t5n2
4d3re2t1t
d2re1v
4d3re2v1l
d2rew
d2re1å
3dré
3dri
5d4ri3a
4dri2b3
4d1ri1d
5d2ri2f
4d3rig
2dri2k
d1rin4g1n
dri2ng
d2ri3u
d2ri1v
d3ri2v3n
4d1ro2ck3
dr2o1c2
1d1ro1d
d2rog
d3ro4g1n
4d1rol
5d4rom
4d3roo
4dr2o1s
5dro2s3l2
4dro1t
4d3ro1v
d4r2o3v2i
5dru1e
4d1rul
2d3rum
d1run
5d4rup
2d2r2y1s
3dræ
4drø
d1rå
8d2s
1d4s1a1d
d3sa
d4s1a2f
ds2ag
d4s1a2n1
1ds2a4n1d
d4s3ar
d4s1a2s
ds3c2
d3s4ca
1ds2e1d
d5se
ds2el2
ds3e7ne
ds2en
d6s3e2ng
d6s1e2r3k2
ds2et
d6s1e1v
d4s5f
d4s1in
d3si
d4s1i7s
ds1ja
d2sj
d3sk
d6s3kag
d4s1kaj
d4s1kan
d4sk2ar
d6s1ka2s
d4sk2e1e
d3ske
d4s1ken
d6s3k1n2
d4s2ko
d6s5kon
d4s1k4ro
dsk2r4
d4sku1li
d4s1k2y4s
d4skæm
d2s1l2
d3s2la
d4s3lan
d3s2l2e1b2
ds1le
d1s2le2s
d4sle1v
d3s2l2og
ds2lu2
ds3lun
d4s1ni
d2s1n4
ds2nø
ds1o2f
d3sog
d5som
d6so2m1f
d4s1o2p
ds1or
ds1o1v
d4spel
d2sp4
ds1pe
d3s2pi
ds2por
ds1po
ds1pu2
d6s7s4
d4s1ta1b2
d3st
d4st2al
d4sta2s
d6s1te1a
d5ste
d4ste1g
d7s2tek
d4s1t2e1o
d4s1ti2l1f
dst2il
d4s1ti2l1s
d4sti1m
ds1tin
d4sti1t
d4s1tom
d5stri
dst2r2
d4stro
d4stu
d6s3t2v
ds1tøj
ds1u1b2
d3su
d4s1u4r.
ds1u1re
ds3v2
ds4vi
1ds5vi4n1d
d5sy
1d6s1y1d
d4s2z
d4s3æn
d3s2æ
d4sø
ds1ø1e
ds1ør
ds1ø1v
6d1t
d2t1ar
d2t1eu
d2t2h4
dt3ha
d2t5hu
dt1in
dt3ja
dt2j
d7to2f
d2t3re
dt2r2
d2t3rø
dt4sa
d4t2s
dt4sk2r4
dt3sk
dt2s2l2
dts2t2r2
dt3st
d3tu
d2t1å
du2b3
dub5l2
2d1u2d
due6s
du1e
du3et
3du2f
2d1u1l2y
3dum
2du4n1d
dun2d3r2
5du1s
4d1v
d7vi
2d1w
dwa4
3dy
4dy1d
dy1k4l
4d1y4n1d
dy2s1p4
d2y1s
dy4sto
dy3s2t
2d1z
dæ2a
2d1æ2b2
2d1æ1d
d1æg
3d2æ2k1
dæ4ko
dæk5st
dæ4k3s
dæ2r5s4
2dø.
3d2ø2b2
3dø2d
dø8d4s
død5sti
død3st
d1ø1e
2dø2e.
d2øe4r.
3døg
døg2ni
dø4g1n
2d1øj
d1øk
2døl
d1ørke
dø2r1k
4d1ø2s
2d1ø1v
2då
d1ån
då2r5s1
3d2å1s2
e1a
e2a1c2
e2a1d
ea2e
ea2l3ek
ea1le
ea2l7s
ea2lu
e2ar
e3a4r3b2
e4a5ri
e2a6t.
ea1t
eate2ren
eate1re
e4au
2e1b2
eba2t
e3ba
e7br4
ebr2ø2d4
e7ce
e1c2
e2c2h1s2
ec4h4
e2c3q2
e3dag6
e1d
e3dal
e3d2am
e2d1a2ng
e2d1a2n1k
e2d1ar
ede4s3tæ
e3de
ede3s2t
ede2s
e1d1i1d
e3di
e4d1in
2e2d1l
e2d1og
2e2dr2
ed1r2am
e3dra
ed3re
e3d1ri
e4drin
ed1ro
ed1ru
ed1ry
e5drø
ed4sku
e8d2s
ed3sk
eds5v2
ed3te
e6d1t
ed4t1en
e2d1u4n1d
e4d1yn
e3dy
e3d2ø
e4d3ø2s
e2d1å
2e1e
e4e.
e4e1b2
e4e1d
e2e1g
ee2k1
e2en
e3e4n1d
e3e2ng
e3e2n7h4
e2e1te
ee2t3h4
e7fa
e1f
1e2f1f
e7fo
efol2k4l
efo2l1k
efo2r
1e2f1t
efte2
e1g
e3g2a
ega5sk
e3ga2s
e3g2e
ege4læ
egem6
1ege6n2s2
e2gl
e3gl2a4
e3g2li
e3glo
e1g1lu
e3g1læ
eg2l6ø
egn5st
e4g1n
eg6n2s
e3g2o
2e1g2r2
e2g3r2e.
eg1re
e2g5s2
e3gu
2e1gå
e7ho
e1h4
e3ho1v4
eh5ru4
e2hr
2ei
ei1e
e2ig
ei6m2s1
ei1m
e1in
e3i4n1d
ein4dr2
e3i2n1k
ei3sk
ei1s
e1iso
e1ja
e7je
e1jo
2ej1r
2e2j1s
e1j2u
e1jæ
ej1ø
e1ka
e1ke
e1ki
e1k2j
e3k4l
ekla4t5
ek2nø
e2k1n2
e7ko
e1k2r4
ek3re
2ek6s.
e4k1s
1ek3sa
3ek5s2am
1eksem
ek5se
ek2s1k
ek4s3l2
ek2so
1ek2sp4
ek6sta
ek4st
eks1ta1t4
ek6s3ti
e1ku
e1k4ur4
e3k2v
e1ky
e1kæ
e1kø
e1kå
e1la
e2lar
el4de1g
e2l2d
el3de
eld5st
el8d2s
eld3s4v2
el3dæ
2elej
e1le
1elem
